Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.020

Dissolution by board of directors and shareholders.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5006.SL) ***

(1) A corporation's board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the shareholders.

(2) For a proposal to dissolve to be approved:

(a) The board of directors must recommend dissolution to the shareholders unless (i) the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation or (ii) RCW 23B.08.245 applies, and in either case the board of directors communicates the basis for so proceeding to the shareholders; and

(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis, including the affirmative vote of holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed dissolution.

(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed dissolution either (a) by giving notice of a shareholders' meeting in accordance with RCW 23B.07.050 and stating that the purpose or one of the purposes of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation, or (b) in accordance with the requirements of RCW 23B.07.040 for approving the proposed dissolution without a meeting.

(5) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the proposed dissolution must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising all the votes entitled to be cast on the proposed dissolution, and of each other voting group entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote separately on the proposed dissolution. The articles of incorporation may require a greater or lesser vote than provided in this subsection, or a greater or lesser vote by any separate voting groups provided for in the articles of incorporation, so long as the required vote is not less than a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the proposed dissolution and of each other voting group entitled to vote separately on the proposed dissolution.

[2011 c 328 s 8; 2009 c 189 s 50; 2006 c 52 s 6; 2003 c 35 s 10; 1989 c 165 s 155.]